src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_piehain_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - piehâin: # ok
    piehâin+N+Sg+Nom: piehâin 
    piehâin+N+Sg+Gen: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Acc: piehâin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Ill: pieˊhânjân
    piehâin+N+Sg+Loc: pieˊhânjist
    piehâin+N+Sg+Com: pieˊhânjáin
    piehâin+N+Sg+Abe: piehâinttáá
    piehâin+N+Ess: pieˊhânjin
    piehâin+N+Par: pieˊhânjid
    piehâin+N+Pl+Nom: pieˊhânjeh
    piehâin+N+Pl+Gen: pieˊhânjij
    piehâin+N+Pl+Acc: pieˊhânjijd
    piehâin+N+Pl+Ill: pieˊhânjáid
    piehâin+N+Pl+Loc: pieˊhânjijn
    piehâin+N+Pl+Com: pieˊhânjijguin
    piehâin+N+Pl+Abe: pieˊhânjijttáá

  Noun - kahhaan: # ok
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaan 
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Ill: kahanjân
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Loc: kahanjist
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Com: kahanjáin
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
    kahhaan+N+Ess: kahanjin
    kahhaan+N+Par: kahanjid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Nom: kahanjeh
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Gen: kahanjij
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Acc: kahanjijd
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Ill: kahanjáid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Loc: kahanjijn
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Com: kahanjijguin
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Abe: kahanjijttáá

  Noun - vuolâin: # ok
    vuolâin+N+Sg+Nom: vuolâin
    vuolâin+N+Sg+Gen: vuolâin
    vuolâin+N+Sg+Acc: vuolâin
    vuolâin+N+Sg+Ill: vuoˊlânjân
    vuolâin+N+Sg+Loc: vuoˊlânjist
    vuolâin+N+Sg+Com: vuoˊlânjáin
    vuolâin+N+Sg+Abe: vuolâinttáá
    vuolâin+N+Ess: vuoˊlânjin
    vuolâin+N+Par: vuoˊlânjid
    vuolâin+N+Pl+Nom: vuoˊlânjeh
    vuolâin+N+Pl+Gen: vuoˊlânjij
    vuolâin+N+Pl+Acc: vuoˊlânjijd
    vuolâin+N+Pl+Ill: vuoˊlânjáid
    vuolâin+N+Pl+Loc: vuoˊlânjijn
    vuolâin+N+Pl+Com: vuoˊlânjijguin
    vuolâin+N+Pl+Abe: vuoˊlânjijttáá

  Noun - suoppâin: # ok
    suoppâin+N+Sg+Nom: suoppâin
    suoppâin+N+Sg+Gen: suoppâin
    suoppâin+N+Sg+Acc: suoppâin
    suoppâin+N+Sg+Ill: suoˊpânjân
    suoppâin+N+Sg+Loc: suoˊpânjist
    suoppâin+N+Sg+Com: suoˊpânjáin
    suoppâin+N+Sg+Abe: suoppâinttáá
    suoppâin+N+Ess: suoˊpânjin
    suoppâin+N+Par: suoˊpânjid
    suoppâin+N+Pl+Nom: suoˊpânjeh
    suoppâin+N+Pl+Gen: suoˊpânjij
    suoppâin+N+Pl+Acc: suoˊpânjijd
    suoppâin+N+Pl+Ill: suoˊpânjáid
    suoppâin+N+Pl+Loc: suoˊpânjijn
    suoppâin+N+Pl+Com: suoˊpânjijguin
    suoppâin+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊpânjijttáá

  Noun - kooppâin: # ok
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Nom: kooppâin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Gen: kooppâin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Acc: kooppâin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Ill: kopânjân
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Loc: kopânjist
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Com: kopânjáin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Abe: kooppâinttáá
    kooppâin+N+Ess: kopânjin
    kooppâin+N+Par: kopânjid
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Nom: kopânjeh
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Gen: kopânjij
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Acc: kopânjijd
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Ill: kopânjáid
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Loc: kopânjijn
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Com: kopânjijguin
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Abe: kopânjijttáá

  Noun - kiäruin: # ok 
    kiäruin+N+Sg+Nom: kiäruin
    kiäruin+N+Sg+Gen: kiäruin
    kiäruin+N+Sg+Acc: kiäruin
    kiäruin+N+Sg+Ill: kiäˊrunjân
    kiäruin+N+Sg+Loc: kiäˊrunjist
    kiäruin+N+Sg+Com: kiäˊrunjáin
    kiäruin+N+Sg+Abe: kiäruinttáá
    kiäruin+N+Ess: kiäˊrunjin
    kiäruin+N+Par: kiäˊrunjid
    kiäruin+N+Pl+Nom: kiäˊrunjeh
    kiäruin+N+Pl+Gen: kiäˊrunjij
    kiäruin+N+Pl+Acc: kiäˊrunjijd
    kiäruin+N+Pl+Ill: kiäˊrunjáid
    kiäruin+N+Pl+Loc: kiäˊrunjijn
    kiäruin+N+Pl+Com: kiäˊrunjijguin
    kiäruin+N+Pl+Abe: kiäˊrunjijttáá

        # MLO sárnum kiärunjijn Matti Morottajain. Täst ennuv variaatio. Väljejum kyehti sujâttemtiijpâ: -in: nj já -nj, mii siäilu. 
    
